Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 60 OIL AND GAS CONSERVATION
34-60-121. Violations - penalties - rules - legislative declaration.

Any operator that violates this article, any rule or order of the commission, or any permit is subject to a penalty of not more than fifteen thousand dollars for each act of violation per day that such violation continues.

The commission may impose a penalty by order only after a hearing in accordance with section 34-60-108 or by an administrative order by consent entered into by the commission and the operator.

The commission shall:

Promulgate rules that establish a penalty schedule appropriate to the nature of the violation and provide for the consideration of any aggravating or mitigating circumstances. The rules must establish the basis for determining the duration of a violation for purposes of imposing the applicable penalty and include presumptions that:

A reporting or other minor operational violation: Begins on the day that the report should have been made or other corrective action should have been taken; and ends when the required report is submitted or other corrective action is commenced;

Any other violation: Begins on the date the violation was discovered or should have been discovered through the exercise of reasonable care; and ends when corrective action is commenced;

The failure to diligently implement corrective action pursuant to a schedule embodied in an administrative order on consent, order finding violation, or other order of the commission constitutes an independent violation for which the operator may be subject to additional penalties or corrective action orders imposed by the commission; and

The number of days of violation does not include any period necessary to allow the operator to engage in good faith negotiation with the commission regarding an alleged violation if the operator demonstrates a prompt, effective, and prudent response to the violation.

Publish a quarterly report on its website that specifies, for each penalty assessed in the previous quarter:

The actual penalty assessed, including the number of days for which the penalty was assessed and the amount of the penalty per day of violation;

The aggravating or mitigating circumstances from the penalty schedule that applied;

Whether the violation was part of a pattern of violations;

Whether an egregious violation resulted from gross negligence or knowing and willful misconduct;

Whether the penalty was assessed after a hearing or by an administrative order by consent; and

Any other rationale used in determining the amount of the per-day penalty, duration of the violation, or amount of the penalty actually assessed; and

Ensure that the reports prepared pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c) are discussed at the annual departmental presentations made pursuant to section 2-7-203, C.R.S.

An operator subject to a penalty order shall pay the amount due within thirty days after its imposition unless the operator files a judicial appeal. The commission may recover penalties owed under this section in a civil action brought by the attorney general at the request of the commission in the second judicial district. Moneys collected through the imposition of penalties shall be credited first to any legal costs and attorney fees incurred by the attorney general in the recovery action and then to the environmental response account in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund created in section 34-60-122.

The general assembly hereby declares that the purposes of this subsection (1) are to deter noncompliance and to encourage any out-of-compliance operators to come into compliance as soon as possible and to those ends intends that, in determining the amount of a penalty, the commission should not reduce the number of days of violation for which a penalty is assessed below that number which the evidence supports.

If any person, for the purpose of evading this article 60 or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, makes or causes to be made any false entry or statement in a report required by this article 60 or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or makes or causes to be made any false entry in any record, account, or memorandum required by this article 60 or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or omits or causes to be omitted from any such record, account, or memorandum full, true, and correct entries as required by this article 60 or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or removes from this state or destroys, mutilates, alters, or falsifies any such record, account, or memorandum, such person commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other person in the violation of any provision of this article 60 or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Whenever the commission or the director has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article, any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any permit has occurred, written notice shall be given to the operator whose act or omission allegedly resulted in such violation. The notice shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the operator or the operator's agent for service of process and shall state the provision alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, and any corrective action and abatement deadlines the commission or director elects to require of the operator.

If an operator fails to take corrective action required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, or whenever the commission or the director has evidence that a violation of any provision of this article, or of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or of any permit has occurred, under circumstances deemed to constitute an emergency situation, the commission or the director may issue a cease-and-desist order to the operator whose act or omission allegedly resulted in such violation. Such cease-and-desist order shall require such action by the operator as the commission or director deems appropriate. The order shall be served personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the operator or the operator's agent for service of process and shall state the provision alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to constitute the violation, the time by which the acts or practices cited are required to cease, and any corrective action the commission or the director elects to require of the operator.

The commission or the director may require an operator to appear for a hearing before the commission no sooner than fifteen days after the issuance of a cease-and-desist order; except that the operator may request an earlier hearing. At any hearing concerning a cease-and-desist order, the commission shall permit all interested parties and any complaining parties to present evidence and argument and to conduct cross-examination required for a full disclosure of the facts.

In the event an operator fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order, the commission may request the attorney general to bring suit pursuant to section 34-60-109.

If the commission determines, after a hearing conducted in accordance with section 34-60-108, that an operator has failed to perform any corrective action imposed under subsection (4) of this section or failed to comply with a cease-and-desist order issued under subsection (5) of this section with regard to a violation of a permit provision, the commission may issue an order suspending, modifying, or revoking such permit or may take other appropriate action. An operator subject to an order that suspends, modifies, or revokes a permit shall continue the affected operations only for the purpose of bringing them into compliance with the permit or modified permit and shall do so under the supervision of the commission. Once the affected operations are in compliance to the satisfaction of the commission and any penalty not subject to judicial review or appeal has been paid, the commission shall reinstate the permit.

The commission or the director shall issue an order to an operator to appear for a hearing before the commission in accordance with section 34-60-108 whenever the commission or the director has evidence that an operator is responsible for:

Gross negligence or knowing and willful misconduct that results in an egregious violation; or

A pattern of violation of this article, any rule or order of the commission, or any permit.

If the commission finds, after such hearing, that the operator is responsible under the legal standards specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7), it may issue an order that prohibits the issuance of any new permits to the operator, suspends any or all of the operator's certificates of clearance, or both. When the operator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commission that it has brought each of the violations into compliance and that any penalty not subject to judicial review or appeal has been paid, the commission may vacate the order.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 656, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-21.

L. 94:

(1) amended and (4) to (7) added, p. 1982, § 9, effective June 2.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 734, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1) and (7) amended, (HB 14-1356), ch. 372, p. 1767, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(2) and (3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3275, § 613, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (1) and enacting subsections (4) to (7), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-122. Expenses - fund created.

In addition to the filing and service fee required to be paid under section 34-60-106 (1)(f) and the fees authorized for other services provided by the commission by section 34-60-106 (16), there is imposed on the market value at the well of all oil and natural gas produced, saved, and sold or transported from the field where produced in this state a charge not to exceed one and seven-tenths mills on the dollar. The commission shall, by order, fix the amount of such charge in the first instance and may, from time to time, reduce or increase the amount thereof as, in its judgment, the expenses chargeable against the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund specified in subsection (5) of this section may require.

On and after July 1, 2019, the commission shall ensure that the unobligated portion of the fund does not exceed fifty percent of total appropriations from the fund for the upcoming fiscal year and that there is an adequate balance in the fund to support the operations of the commission and to address environmental response needs.

On or before March 1, June 1, September 1, and December 1 of each year, every producer or purchaser, whichever disburses funds directly to each and every person owning a working interest, a royalty interest, an overriding royalty interest, a production payment and other similar interests from the sale of oil or natural gas subject to the charge imposed by subsection (1) of this section, shall file a return with the commission showing the volume of oil, gas, or condensate produced or purchased during the preceding calendar quarter, and the actual sales value of such oil, gas, or condensate, including the total consideration due or received at the point of delivery. Such return shall be accompanied by the total amount of the charges due on all interests in the oil or gas except those interests exempted under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

Each producer shall advise the commission whether he or the purchaser will be responsible for reporting and remitting the levy under the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2). If the return is filed by the producer, the producer shall maintain at his place of business for three years the invoice or statement issued by each purchaser showing the amount of oil or gas purchased, the producing lease from which such purchase was made, and the total sales price paid. Such purchaser invoice or statement may be requested periodically by the commission with the quarterly report.

Any producer or purchaser who files a return pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall pay any such charge or any interest other than his own, and such producer or purchaser is authorized to deduct the amount of such payment from any amount owed by him to the person for whom such charge was paid. Any such charge not paid when required by subsection (2) of this section shall bear interest at the rate of three percent per month, from the date of delinquency until paid.

The charge imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the interest in any oil or gas or the proceeds therefrom of the following:

The United States;

The state of Colorado or any of its political subdivisions;

Any Indian or Indian tribe on production from land subject to the supervision of the United States.

The commission shall collect all charges and penalties under this article 60 and remit them to the state treasurer for deposit in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury.

There is hereby created in the fund the environmental response account, into which shall be deposited penalties pursuant to section 34-60-121 (1). Expenditures authorized pursuant to section 34-60-124 (4) shall be paid in the first instance from the account, and expenditures authorized pursuant to section 34-60-124 (10) shall not be paid from the account. The year-end balance of the account remains in the account.

The general assembly shall annually make appropriations for the purposes authorized by section 34-60-124, and warrants shall be drawn against the appropriations as provided by law.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 662, § 18.

CSA:

C. 118, § 68(16).

L. 53:

p. 444, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 100-6-20.

L. 59:

p. 606, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-20.

L. 65:

p. 900, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1051, § 1.

L. 77:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 1570, § 2, effective June 1; (2) and (3) amended, p. 1769, § 9, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 78:

(5) amended, p. 273, § 96, effective May 23.

L. 84:

(2) R&RE and (3) and (5) amended, pp. 936, 937, §§ 1, 2, effective April 27.

L. 86:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 1073, § 2, effective April 3.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1274, § 1, effective May 8.

L. 88:

(5) amended, p. 1217, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 90:

(1) R&RE, p. 1545, § 2, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(2)(a) and (5) amended, pp. 1415, 1416, §§ 4, 5, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(1)(b) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1984, § 10, effective June 2.

L. 2005:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (5) amended, p. 731, § 1, effective July 1; (1)(b) amended, p. 542, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) amended, p. 220, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2014:

(1)(b) amended, (HB14-1077), ch. 79, p. 319, § 1, effective March 27.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (HB 18-1098), ch. 107, p. 796, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 519, § 15, effective April 16.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(b) by House Bill 05-1285 and Senate Bill 05-066 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For disposition of moneys collected by state agencies or instrumentalities, see § 24-36-103.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsections (1)(b) and (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-123. Interstate compact to conserve oil and gas.

The governor may execute agreements with other member states for expiration date extensions or other modifications of the terms of the interstate compact to conserve oil and gas. The governor may further take all steps necessary to effect withdrawal of this state from the compact upon his determination that withdrawal is in the best interests of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1411, § 73.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 100-6-23.

34-60-124. Oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund.

The following moneys shall be credited to the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund:

The revenues from the surcharge imposed by the commission pursuant to section 34-60-122 (1)(a);

Moneys reimbursed to or recovered by the commission in payment for fund expenditures;

Any moneys appropriated to such fund by the general assembly;

Any moneys granted to the commission from any federal agency for the purposes outlined under subsection (4) of this section;

Prepayments by operators, in situations where a responsible party cannot be identified, as a credit against the surcharge imposed by section 34-60-122 (1)(a), whether in cash or through the provision of services or equipment, in order that the commission may conduct the activities provided for in subsection (4) of this section;

Moneys recovered from the sale of salvaged equipment, as provided for in paragraph (c) of subsection (6) of this section.

The moneys in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund shall not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly; except that moneys deposited in the fund constituting forfeited security or other financial assurance provided by operators in accordance with section 34-60-106 (3.5) and (13) shall be continuously appropriated to the commission for the purpose of fulfilling obligations under this article upon which an operator has defaulted.

The oil and gas conservation and environmental response fund may be expended:

By the commission, or by the director at the commission's direction, prior to, during, or after the conduct of oil and gas operations to:

Investigate, prevent, monitor, or mitigate conditions that threaten to cause, or that actually cause, a significant adverse environmental impact on any air, water, soil, or biological resource;

Gather background or baseline data on any air, water, soil, or biological resource that the commission determines may be so impacted by the conduct of oil and gas operations; and

Investigate alleged violations of any provision of this article, any rule or order of the commission, or any permit where the alleged violation threatens to cause or actually causes a significant adverse environmental impact;

For purposes authorized by section 23-41-114 (4), C.R.S.;

Repealed.

The director of the oil and gas conservation commission shall prepare an annual report for the executive director of the department of natural resources and the governor regarding the operations of and disbursements from the fund.

For the purposes provided for in subsection (4) of this section, the commission is authorized to:

Enter onto any lands or waters, public or private; and, except in emergency situations, the commission shall provide reasonable notice prior to such entry in order to allow a surface owner, local government designee, operator, or responsible party to be present and to obtain duplicate samples and copies of analytical reports;

Require responsible parties to conduct investigation or monitoring activities and to provide the commission with the results;

Confiscate and sell for salvage any equipment abandoned by a responsible party at a location where the conduct of oil and gas operations has resulted in a significant adverse environmental impact; except that this authority shall be subject to and secondary to any valid liens, security interests, or other legal interests in such equipment asserted by any taxing authority or by any creditor of the responsible party.

If the commission determines that mitigation of a significant adverse environmental impact on any air, water, soil, or biological resource is necessary as a result of the conduct of oil and gas operations, the commission shall issue an order requiring the responsible party to perform such mitigation. If the responsible party cannot be identified or refuses to comply with such order, the commission shall authorize the necessary expenditures from the fund. The commission shall bring suit in the second judicial district to recover such expenditures from any responsible party who refuses to perform such mitigation or any responsible party who is subsequently identified, such action to be brought within a two-year period from the date that final expenditures were authorized. Moneys recovered as a result of such suit shall first be applied to the commission's legal costs and attorney fees and shall then be credited to the fund.

For purposes of this section, "responsible party" means any person who conducts an oil and gas operation in a manner which is in contravention of any then-applicable provision of this article, or of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or of any permit that threatens to cause, or actually causes, a significant adverse environmental impact to any air, water, soil, or biological resource. "Responsible party" includes any person who disposes of any other waste by mixing it with exploration and production waste that threatens to cause, or actually causes, a significant adverse environmental impact to any air, water, soil, or biological resource.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), "responsible party" does not include any landowner, whether of the surface estate, mineral estate, or both, who does not engage in, or assume responsibility for, the conduct of oil and gas operations.

For purposes of this section, any person who is found to be a responsible party shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the commission and the courts of the state of Colorado. Each responsible party shall be liable only for a proportionate share of any costs imposed under this section and shall not be held jointly and severally liable for such costs.

The fund shall be expended by the commission or by the director for the purposes of administering the provisions of this article, including staffing, overhead, enforcement, and the payment of environmental responses costs, and for paying expenses in connection with the interstate oil and gas compact commission.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1546, § 3, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(4) amended, p. 1416, § 6, effective April 19.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1985, § 11, effective June 2.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 826, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2002:

(5) amended, p. 878, § 8, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(e), (2), (3), and (4) amended and (10) added, p. 732, § 2, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 541, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(4) amended and (4)(c) added, p. 1587, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2011:

(4)(c) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1173, § 86, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (4) by House Bill 05-1285 and Senate Bill 05-066 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-125. Mitigation of adverse environmental impacts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1546, § 3, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1416, § 7, effective April 19.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1987, § 12, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-126. Credit allowed for prior payment for mitigation of environmental impacts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1546, § 3, effective May 8.

L. 91:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1417, § 8, effective April 19.

L. 94:

Entire section repealed, p. 1989, § 13, effective June 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 317, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

34-60-127. Reasonable accommodation.

An operator shall conduct oil and gas operations in a manner that accommodates the surface owner by minimizing intrusion upon and damage to the surface of the land.

As used in this section, "minimizing intrusion upon and damage to the surface" means selecting alternative locations for wells, roads, pipelines, or production facilities, or employing alternative means of operation, that prevent, reduce, or mitigate the impacts of the oil and gas operations on the surface, where such alternatives are technologically sound, economically practicable, and reasonably available to the operator.

The standard of conduct set forth in this section shall not be construed to prevent an operator from entering upon and using that amount of the surface as is reasonable and necessary to explore for, develop, and produce oil and gas.

The standard of conduct set forth in this section shall not be construed to abrogate or impair a contractual provision binding on the parties that expressly provides for the use of the surface for the conduct of oil and gas operations or that releases the operator from liability for the use of the surface.

An operator's failure to meet the requirements set forth in this section shall give rise to a cause of action by the surface owner. Upon a determination by the trier of fact that such failure has occurred, a surface owner may seek compensatory damages or such equitable relief as is consistent with subsection (1) of this section.

In any litigation or arbitration based upon this section, the surface owner shall present evidence that the operator's use of the surface materially interfered with the surface owner's use of the surface of the land. After such showing, the operator shall bear the burden of proof of showing that it met the standard set out in subsection (1) of this section. If an operator makes that showing, the surface owner may present rebuttal evidence.

An operator may assert, as an affirmative defense, that it has conducted oil and gas operations in accordance with a regulatory requirement, contractual obligation, or land use plan provision, that is specifically applicable to the alleged intrusion or damage.

Nothing in this section shall:

Preclude or impair any person from obtaining any and all other remedies allowed by law;

Prevent an operator and a surface owner from addressing the use of the surface for oil and gas operations in a lease, surface use agreement, or other written contract; or

Establish, alter, impair, or negate the authority of local and county governments to regulate land use related to oil and gas operations.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1335, § 2, effective September 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 314, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

34-60-128. Habitat stewardship - rules.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Habitat Stewardship Act of 2007".

The commission shall administer this article so as to minimize adverse impacts to wildlife resources affected by oil and gas operations.

In order to minimize adverse impacts to wildlife resources, the commission shall:

Establish a timely and efficient procedure for consultation with the parks and wildlife commission and division of parks and wildlife on decision-making that impacts wildlife resources;

Provide for commission consultation and consent of the affected surface owner, or the surface owner's appointed tenant, on permit-specific conditions for wildlife habitat protection that directly impact the affected surface owner's property or use of that property. Such permit-specific conditions for wildlife habitat protection shall be discontinued when final reclamation has occurred. Permit-specific conditions for wildlife habitat protection that do not directly impact the affected surface owner's property or use of that property, such as off-site compensatory mitigation requirements, do not require the consent of the surface owner or the surface owner's appointed tenant.

Implement, whenever reasonably practicable, best management practices and other reasonable measures to conserve wildlife resources;

Promulgate rules, by July 16, 2008, in consultation with the parks and wildlife commission, to establish standards for minimizing adverse impacts to wildlife resources affected by oil and gas operations and to ensure the proper reclamation of wildlife habitat during and following such operations. At a minimum, the rules shall address:

Developing a timely and efficient consultation process with the division of parks and wildlife governing notification and consultation on minimizing adverse impacts, and other issues relating to wildlife resources;

Encouraging operators to utilize comprehensive drilling plans and geographic area analysis strategies to provide for orderly development of oil and gas fields;

Minimizing surface disturbance and fragmentation in important wildlife habitat by incorporating appropriate best management practices:

In orders or rules establishing drilling units or allowing the drilling of additional wells in drilling units pursuant to section 34-60-116;

In orders approving agreements for development or unit operations pursuant to section 34-60-118; and

On a site-specific basis, as conditions of approval to a permit to drill pursuant to section 34-60-106 (1)(f).

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1329, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(3)(d) amended, p. 1034, § 2, effective May 21.

L. 2012:

(3)(a) and IP(3)(d) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1235, § 91, effective June 4.

L. 2019:

(3)(b) amended and (4) repealed, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 520, § 16, effective April 16.

34-60-129. Coalbed methane seepage - fund created - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1586, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2010. (See L. 2007, p. 1586.)

34-60-130. Reporting of spills - rules.

If one barrel or more of oil or exploration and production waste is spilled outside of berms or other secondary containment, the spill shall be reported within twenty-four hours after the discovery of the spill, to:

The commission; and

The entity with jurisdiction over emergency response within the local municipality, if the spill occurred within a municipality, or the local county if the spill did not occur within a municipality.

The spill report must include any available information concerning the type of waste involved in the spill.

The commission may promulgate rules to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1278), ch. 188, p. 759, § 1, effective August 7.

34-60-131. No land use preemption.

Local governments and state agencies, including the commission and agencies listed in section 34-60-105 (1)(b), have regulatory authority over oil and gas development, including as specified in section 34-60-105 (1)(b). A local government's regulations may be more protective or stricter than state requirements.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-181), ch. 120, p. 520, § 17, effective April 16.